Utah statutes.
58-46a-201.   Board.

(1)  There is created the Hearing Instrument Specialist Licensing Board consisting of three licensed hearing instrument specialists and two members of the general public.

(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3) (a)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be as provided in Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.

(b) (i)  The board shall designate one of its members on a permanent or rotating basis to assist the division in the review of complaints concerning unlawful or unprofessional practice by a licensee regulated by the board under this chapter and to advise the division with respect to the conduct of investigations of such complaints.

(ii)  A board member who under Subsection (3)(b) reviewed a complaint or advised the division in its investigation is disqualified from participating as a member of the board when the board serves as a presiding officer in any administrative or adjudicative procedure concerning the complaint.

